Indiana, session 2026, HB1410.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-2-1-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the board shall
establish a program to allow a law enforcement officer who has
successfully completed the Tier II basic training requirement to
subsequently complete the additional Tier I basic training
requirements.
(b) The Tier II law enforcement officer is responsible for the
cost of the additional training unless the cost is otherwise agreed to
be paid by a law enforcement agency.
2026 IN 1410—LS 6955/DI 116